Utah statutes.
63M-9-501.   Evaluation of programs -- Report to legislative interim committee.

(1)  At the end of each fiscal year, a final report shall be submitted to the council summarizing the outcome of each project under this chapter.

(2) (a)  The council may conduct an independent evaluation of any or all of the projects to assess the status of services provided and identified outcomes.

(b)  The council shall prepare and deliver a report on the program to the Legislature's Education, Health and Human Services, and Judiciary Interim Committees before October 1, 2005.

(c)  The report shall include a recommendation by the council as to whether the program should be terminated, continued, or expanded.

